Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4308
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 77-4301 to 77-4316 shall in any manner provide immunity for a dealer from criminal prosecution pursuant to Nebraska law.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 29.